Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE D. IRRIGATION DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7501. DONNA IRRIGATION DISTRICT, HIDALGO COUNTY NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7501.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Donna Irrigation District, Hidalgo County No. 1.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 7501.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Hidalgo County, Texas, created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, for all purposes of that section, including:

(1) the reclamation and irrigation of the district's arid, semiarid, and other land that needs irrigation; and

(2) the reclamation and drainage of the district's overflowed land and other land that needs drainage.

(b) The district is a political subdivision of this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 7501.003. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:

(1) the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) the creation of the district as a conservation and reclamation district:

(A) will result in:

(i) material benefits and improvements to district territory; and

(ii) the increase of the taxable value of property in the district;

(B) benefits all property in the district; and

(C) will result in material benefit to that section of the state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 7501.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 26, Special Laws, Acts of the 41st Legislature, 4th Called Session, 1930; Section 1, Chapter 108, Acts of the 56th Legislature, Regular Session, 1959; Section 1, Chapter 133, Acts of the 57th Legislature, Regular Session, 1961; and Section 1, Chapter 247, Acts of the 57th Legislature, Regular Session, 1961, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Chapter 25, General Laws, Acts of the 39th Legislature, Regular Session, 1925 (Article 7880-1 et seq., Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), before August 30, 1971;

(2) Chapter 3, General Laws, Acts of the 46th Legislature, Regular Session, 1939 (Article 7775c-1, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), before August 30, 1971;

(3) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code, before December 15, 1978;

(4) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code, as restricted by Section 7501.005 of this code;

(5) Subchapter N, Chapter 58, Water Code; or

(6) other law.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 7501.005. NONAPPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Sections 49.303-49.308 and 58.501-58.509, Water Code, do not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT POWERS

Sec. 7501.051. GENERAL POWERS. The district has:

(1) the powers of a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and the general laws of this state; and

(2) the powers of government and the authority to exercise the rights, privileges, and functions that are conferred by this chapter and the general laws of this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2019), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2007.